fi: Autolelusetin mukana tulevat osat: Rakennukset/rakennelmat; Hissi/nostin; Ramppi/rampit; Tiepalat; Tarrat/siirtokuvat; Säilytystilat/autotallit; Sisältää leikkiautoja; Sisältää leikkihahmoja; Sisältää leikkikuorma-autoja; Ratapalat; Liikennemerkit/kartiot; Muu
hu: Autós játékszett mellékelt elemei: Épületek/szerkezetek; Lift/emelő; Rámpák; Útelemek; Matricák; Tároló-/garázshelyek; Játékautó(k) mellékelve; Játékfigurá(k) mellékelve; Játékkamion(ok) mellékelve; Pályaelemek; Közlekedési táblák/bóják; Egyéb
tr: Araba oyun seti dahil öğeler: Binalar/yapılar; Asansör/kaldıraç; Rampa(lar); Yol parçaları; Çıkartmalar/etiketler; Depolama/garaj bölmeleri; Oyuncak araba(lar) dahil; Oyuncak figür(ler) dahil; Oyuncak kamyon(lar) dahil; Pist parçaları; Trafik işaretleri/konileri; Diğer
ko: 자동차 플레이 세트 품목 포함: 건물/구조물; 엘리베이터/리프트; 경사로; 도로 부품; 스티커/데칼; 보관소/차고 베이; 장난감 자동차 포함; 장난감 피규어 포함; 장난감 트럭 포함; 트랙 부품; 교통 표지판/콘; 기타
pl: Elementy zestawu samochodowego w zestawie: Budynki/konstrukcje; Winda/podnośnik; Rampy; Elementy drogi; Naklejki/kalkomanie; Wnęki magazynowe/garażowe; Samochodziki w zestawie; Figurki w zestawie; Ciężarówki zabawkowe w zestawie; Elementy toru; Znaki drogowe/pachołki; Inne
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no conjunto de carrinhos de brinquedos: Edifícios/estruturas; Elevador; Rampa(s); Peças de estrada; Autocolantes/decalques; Armazenamento/zonas de garagem; Carro(s) de brincar incluído(s); Figura(s) de brincar incluída(s); Camião(ões) de brincar incluído(s); Peças de pista; Sinais de trânsito/cones; Outro
th: รายการชิ้นส่วนที่รวมอยู่ในชุดของเล่นรถยนต์: อาคาร/สิ่งปลูกสร้าง; ลิฟต์/ที่ยกรถ; ทางลาด; ชิ้นส่วนถนน; สติกเกอร์/รูปลอก; ช่องเก็บของ/ช่องจอดรถ; มีรถของเล่นในชุด; มีฟิกเกอร์ของเล่นในชุด; มีรถบรรทุกของเล่นในชุด; ชิ้นส่วนราง; ป้ายจราจร/กรวย; อื่นๆ
nb: Bilsett inkludert: Bygninger/strukturer; Heis; Rampe(r); Veideler; Klistremerker/dekaler; Oppbevaring / garasjefag; Lekebil(er) inkludert; Lekefigur(er) inkludert; Lekelastebil(er) inkludert; Banedeler; Trafikkskilt/kjegler; Annet
da: Medfølgende dele til legetøjsbilsæt: Bygninger/strukturer; Elevator/lift; Rampe(r); Vejstykker; Klistermærker/mærkater; Opbevaring/garagefag; Legetøjsbil(er) medfølger; Legetøjsfigur(er) medfølger; Legetøjslastbil(er) medfølger; Banestykker; Trafikskilte/-kegler; Andet
hr-HR: Uključen set za igru s automobilima: Zgrade / strukture; Dizalo; Rampe; Dijelovi ceste; Naljepnice; Prostori za pohranu / garažni prostori; Uključeni autići; Uključene figure; Uključeni kamiončići; Dijelovi staze; Prometni znakovi / čunjevi; Ostalo
ja: 車のプレイセットアイテム付き: 建物/構造物; エレベーター/リフト; スロープ; 道路パーツ; ステッカー/デカール; 収納/ガレージ間口; ミニカー付属; フィギュア付属; トラックのおもちゃ付属; トラックパーツ; 道路標識/コーン; その他
en: Car playset items included: Buildings/structures; Elevator/lift; Ramp(s); Road pieces; Stickers/decals; Storage/garage bays; Toy car(s) included; Toy figure(s) included; Toy truck(s) included; Track pieces; Traffic signs/cones; Other
it: articolo del playset dell'auto incluso: Edifici/strutture; Ascensore/montacarichi; Rampe; Pezzi di strada; Adesivi/decalcomanie; Box/posti auto; Macchinine incluse; Personaggi inclusi; Camion giocattolo inclusi; Pezzi di pista; Segnali stradali/coni; Altro
ro-RO: Articole incluse în setul de joacă cu mașini: Clădiri/structuri; Ascensor/lift; Rampe; Piese de drum; Autocolante/decalcomanii; Compartimente de depozitare/garaj; Mașinuțe de jucărie incluse; Figurine de jucărie incluse; Camioane de jucărie incluse; Piese de pistă; Indicatoare de circulație/conuri; Altele
cs: Součásti hercí sady s autíčky: Budovy/stavby; Výtah/plošina; Rampy; Díly silnice; Samolepky/obtisky; Úložné/garážové prostory; Včetně autíček; Včetně figurek; Včetně nákladních autíček; Díly autodráhy; Dopravní značky / kužely; Jiné
pt-BR: Itens incluídos no conjunto de brinquedos de carros: Prédios/estruturas; Elevador; Rampa(s); Peças de estrada; Adesivos/decalques; Compartimentos de armazenamento/garagem; Carro(s) de brinquedo incluso(s); Figura(s) de brinquedo inclusa(s); Caminhão(ões) de brinquedo incluso(s); Peças de pista; Placas de trânsito/cones; Outro
zh-CN: 汽车玩具套装内含配件: 建筑/结构物; 电梯/升降机; 坡道; 道路模块; 贴纸/印花; 存储/车库隔间; 含玩具车; 含玩具人偶; 含玩具卡车; 轨道模块; 交通标志/路锥; 其他
es: Elementos incluidos en el set de juego de autos: Edificios/estructuras; Ascensor/elevador; Rampas; Piezas de carretera; Pegatinas/calcomanías; Espacios de almacenamiento/garaje; Coches de juguete incluidos; Figuras de juguete incluidas; Camiones de juguete incluidos; Piezas de pista; Señales de tráfico/conos; Otro
ru: Комплектация набора игрушечных машинок: Здания/сооружения; Лифт/подъемник; Пандус(ы); Фрагменты дороги; Наклейки/декали; Зоны хранения/гаражные секции; Игрушечные автомобили в комплекте; Игрушечные фигурки в комплекте; Игрушечные грузовики в комплекте; Фрагменты трассы; Дорожные знаки/конусы; Другое
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi v avtomobilskem igralnem kompletu: Zgradbe/objekti; Dvigalo; Klančine; Deli ceste; Nalepke/preslikači; Shranjevanje/garažni boksi; Vključeni avtomobilčki; Vključene igralne figure; Vključeni tovornjaki (igrače); Deli proge; Prometni znaki/stožci; Drugo
sk-SK: Komponenty hernej zostavy s autíčkom v cene: Budovy/stavby; Výťah; Rampy; Dielce ciest; Nálepky/obtlačky; Úložné/garážové boxy; Vrátane autíčok; Vrátane figúrok; Vrátane nákladných autíčok; Dielce dráhy; Dopravné značky/kužele; Iné
zh-TW: 包含汽車遊戲組品項: 建築/結構; 電梯/升降機; 坡道; 道路零件; 貼紙/水貼; 收納/車庫區; 包含玩具車; 包含玩具公仔; 包含玩具卡車; 軌道片; 交通標誌/三角錐; 其他
lt-LT: Įtraukti automobilių žaidimų rinkinio daiktai: Pastatai / konstrukcijos; Liftas / keltuvas; Rampa (-os); Kelio dalys; Lipdukai / aplikacijos; Saugyklos / garažo vietos; Yra žaislinis automobilis (-iai); Žaislinė figūrėlė (-ės); Žaislinis sunkvežimis (-iai); Trasos dalys; Kelio ženklai / kūgiai; Kita
sv: Artiklar för billekset som ingår: Byggnader/strukturer; Hiss/lyft; Ramp(er); Vägdelar; Klistermärken/dekaler; Förvaring/garagefack; Leksaksbil(ar) ingår; Leksaksfigur(er) ingår; Leksakslastbil(ar) ingår; Bandelar; Trafikskyltar/-koner; Annat
el: Περιλαμβάνεται κομμάτια σετ παιχνιδιού αυτοκινήτου: Κτίρια/κατασκευές; Ανελκυστήρας; Ράμπες; Κομμάτια δρόμου; Αυτοκόλλητα/χαλκομανίες; Θέσεις αποθήκευσης/γκαράζ; Περιλαμβάνονται αυτοκινητάκια; Περιλαμβάνονται φιγούρες; Περιλαμβάνονται φορτηγάκια; Κομμάτια πίστας; Σήματα κυκλοφορίας/κώνοι; Άλλο
nl: Auto speelgoedset items inbegrepen: Gebouwen/constructies; Lift; Helling(en); Wegdelen; Stickers/decals; Opslag/garagevakken; Inclusief speelgoedauto('s); Speelgoedfigu(u)r(en) inbegrepen; Speelgoedtruck(s) inbegrepen; Baanstukken; Verkeersborden/pionnen; Overige
de: Enthaltene Auto-Spielset-Artikel: Gebäude/Strukturen; Aufzug/Lift; Rampe(n); Straßenteile; Aufkleber/Decals; Stauräume/Garagenboxen; Spielzeugauto(s) inklusive; Spielfigur(en) inklusive; Spielzeug-Lkw inklusive; Streckenteile; Verkehrsschilder/Leitkegel; Sonstige
fr: Éléments inclus dans le coffret de jeu de voitures: Bâtiments/structures; Ascenseur/monte-charge; Rampe(s); Morceaux de route; Autocollants/décalcomanies; Baies de stockage/garage; Voiture(s) miniature(s) incluse(s); Figurine(s) incluse(s); Camion(s) miniature(s) inclus; Morceaux de circuit; Panneaux/cônes de signalisation; Autre
vi: Các mặt hàng đi kèm trong bộ đồ chơi xe ô tô: Tòa nhà/công trình; Thang máy/cầu nâng; Đường dốc; Mảnh đường ghép; Hình dán/decal; Nhà kho/gian nhà xe; Kèm ô tô đồ chơi; Kèm nhân vật đồ chơi; Kèm xe tải đồ chơi; Mảnh đường đua ghép; Biển báo giao thông/cọc tiêu; Khác
bg-BG: Елементи, включени в комплекта за игра с автомобили: Сгради/структури; Асансьор/подемник; Рампа(и); Пътни части; Стикери/ваденки; Гаражни клетки/места за съхранение; Включена(и) кола(и) играчка(и); Включена(и) фигурка(и) играчка(и); Включен(и) камион(и) играчка(и); Части за писта; Пътни знаци/конуси; Друго